Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-337
Bonds; maturity; recitals.

The maturity of all bonds shall be fixed on July 1 of the year in which they mature and shall contain a recital that the same were issued in accordance with the provisions of sections 31-336 to 31-348, and that they are to be paid out of a sinking fund to be created as provided in section 31-351.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 20, p. 626;

Laws 1907, c. 152, § 4, p. 471;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 10, p. 521;

R.S.1913, § 1832;

C.S.1922, § 1779;

C.S.1929, § 31-436;

R.S.1943, § 31-337.